Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-2807
Rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Manufacturing Modernization and Workforce Development Pilot Investment Act.

Laws 2025, LB265, § 7.